Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1073.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVIII-ISHELTER ANIMAL ADOPTION TAX CREDITSection 1801-I. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819202122 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Shelter animal." A cat or dog placed in a pound, shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals, humane society or rescue association."Tax credit." The shelter animal adoption tax credit established under this article."Taxpayer." An individual subject to tax under Article III who adopts a shelter animal.Section 1802-I. Shelter Animal Adoption Tax Credit Program.(a) Establishment.--The Shelter Animal Adoption Tax Credit Program is established to encourage the adoption of shelter animals.(b) Maximum amount.--(1) A taxpayer may claim a tax credit of $100 per adopted shelter animal.(2) A taxpayer may claim a tax credit for a maximum of three shelter animals per taxable year, provided that keeping the shelter animal is not in violation of any applicable provisions of Federal, State or local law.Section 1803-I. Application process.A taxpayer may claim the tax credit on the tax return filed under Article III and shall include with the tax return all of the following:(1) Proof that the shelter animal has been spayed or neutered.(2) Proof of adoption of the shelter animal during the qualifying taxable year.Section 1804-I. Tax credits.(a) Applicable taxes.--A taxpayer may apply the tax credit 20250HB1073PN1172 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to taxes imposed under Article III.(b) Taxable year.--The tax credit shall be allowed with respect to the taxable year, commencing after the effective date of this section, in which the shelter animal is adopted.Section 1805-I. Carry back and refund.A taxpayer may not carry back, obtain a refund of, sell or assign an unused tax credit.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1073PN1172 - 3 - 12345678